Maryland, session 2025, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 794 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall contract with an independent
consultant to study the Health Services Cost Review Commission (HSCRC), the Maryland
Health Care Commission (MHCC), the Maryland Community Health Resources
Commission (MCHRC), and the Maryland Insurance Administration (MIA).
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
independent contractor shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1376*

HOUSE BILL 1376
(1) examine overlap of the statutory and regulatory duties performed by
HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA;
(2) identify statutory or regulatory duties performed by HSCRC, MHCC,
MCHRC, and MIA that may be more appropriately performed by the Department or
another commission or agency;
(3) identify whether and how HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA could be
streamlined to reduce overlap of duties;
(4) identify whether and how the functions of HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC,
and MIA could be better aligned to improve effectiveness and efficiency;
(5) examine the alignment of the statutory or regulatory duties performed
by HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA with the Maryland Total Cost of Care model and
the State’s participation in the Advancing All–Payer Health Equity Approaches and
Development (AHEAD) model; and
(6) recommend any changes in HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA
administrative structure that may improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the
commission or agency.
(c) The independent consultant hired under subsection (a) of this section shall
seek input from the Department, HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA in conducting the
study.
(d) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE IN THE CONTRACT REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION A REQUIREMENT THAT THE
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT STUDY THE CURRENT PROVISION OF HEALTH CARE
SERVICES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING PROGRAMS AND PAYORS, AND MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS TO CONSOLIDATE PAYORS AND PROGRAMS IN THE STATE TO
MAXIMIZE HEALTH CARE COVERAGE FOR RESIDENTS OF THE STATE IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE STUDY CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) IF THE CONTRACT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN ENTERED INTO BEFORE JUNE 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
AMEND THE CONTRACT TO REQUIRE THE STUDY DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee on the
results of the study conducted under [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (a) AND (D) of this
section.

HOUSE BILL 1376 3
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A COMPREHENSIVE SYNTHESIS OF COMPLETED ANALYSES
OF THE STATE’S EXISTING HEALTH CARE FINANCE AND DELIVERY SYSTEM,
INCLUDING COST, QUALITY, WORKFORCE, AND PROVIDER CONSOLIDATION TRENDS
AND THE IMPACT ON THE STATE’S ABILITY TO PROVIDE ALL MARYLANDERS WITH
TIMELY ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY, AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE;
(II) A REVIEW OF STRATEGIES IMPLEMENTED IN OTHER STATES
TO ENSURE UNIVERSAL ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE, INCLUDING COVERAGE
EXPANSIONS, COST CONTAINMENT, AND AFFORDABILITY EFFORTS, PROVIDER
REIMBURSEMENT POLICIES, AND DATA AND REPORTING TO MONITOR HEALTH CARE
DELIVERY SYSTEM PERFORMANCE; AND
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STRATEGIES THE STATE SHOULD
CONSIDER TO ENSURE COVERAGE AND TIMELY ACCESS TO HIGH QUALITY,
AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE FOR ALL MARYLANDERS, AS WELL AS POTENTIAL
FUNDING OPTIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES.
Chapter 795 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall contract with an independent
consultant to study the Health Services Cost Review Commission (HSCRC), the Maryland
Health Care Commission (MHCC), the Maryland Community Health Resources
Commission (MCHRC), and the Maryland Insurance Administration (MIA).
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
independent contractor shall:
(1) examine overlap of the statutory and regulatory duties performed by
HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA;
(2) identify statutory or regulatory duties performed by HSCRC, MHCC,
MCHRC, and MIA that may be more appropriately performed by the Department or
another commission or agency;
(3) identify whether and how HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA could be
streamlined to reduce overlap of duties;
(4) identify whether and how the functions of HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC,
and MIA could be better aligned to improve effectiveness and efficiency;

HOUSE BILL 1376
(5) examine the alignment of the statutory or regulatory duties performed
by HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA with the Maryland Total Cost of Care model and
the State’s participation in the Advancing All–Payer Health Equity Approaches and
Development (AHEAD) model; and
(6) recommend any changes in HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA
administrative structure that may improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the
commission or agency.
(c) The independent consultant hired under subsection (a) of this section shall
seek input from the Department, HSCRC, MHCC, MCHRC, and MIA in conducting the
study.
(d) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE IN THE CONTRACT REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION A REQUIREMENT THAT THE
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT STUDY THE CURRENT PROVISION OF HEALTH CARE
SERVICES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING PROGRAMS AND PAYORS, AND MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS TO CONSOLIDATE PAYORS AND PROGRAMS IN THE STATE TO
MAXIMIZE HEALTH CARE COVERAGE FOR RESIDENTS OF THE STATE IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE STUDY CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) IF THE CONTRACT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN ENTERED INTO BEFORE JUNE 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
AMEND THE CONTRACT TO REQUIRE THE STUDY DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee on the
results of the study conducted under [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (a) AND (D) of this
section.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A COMPREHENSIVE SYNTHESIS OF COMPLETED ANALYSES
OF THE STATE’S EXISTING HEALTH CARE FINANCE AND DELIVERY SYSTEM,
INCLUDING COST, QUALITY, WORKFORCE, AND PROVIDER CONSOLIDATION TRENDS
AND THE IMPACT ON THE STATE’S ABILITY TO PROVIDE ALL MARYLANDERS WITH
TIMELY ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY, AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE;
(II) A REVIEW OF STRATEGIES IMPLEMENTED IN OTHER STATES
TO ENSURE UNIVERSAL ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE, INCLUDING COVERAGE
EXPANSIONS, COST CONTAINMENT, AND AFFORDABILITY EFFORTS, PROVIDER

HOUSE BILL 1376 5
REIMBURSEMENT POLICIES, AND DATA AND REPORTING TO MONITOR HEALTH CARE
DELIVERY SYSTEM PERFORMANCE; AND
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STRATEGIES THE STATE SHOULD
CONSIDER TO ENSURE COVERAGE AND TIMELY ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY,
AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE FOR ALL MARYLANDERS, AS WELL AS POTENTIAL
FUNDING OPTIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.